Tennessee statutes. Title 7 Consolidated Governments and Local Governmental Functions and Entities
Part 3

Utility Services

7-21-301. Authority — Administration.

Any unified government created and established under this chapter shall possess all powers, rights, obligations, duties and privileges to provide electricity, natural gas, water, wastewater, solid waste disposal, recycling, energy production or any other utility service as permitted by the charter, collectively referred to as “utility services”, or any combination thereof; but in no event shall any initial charter provision supersede or conflict with § 7-21-206(p).

The powers granted to any unified government in this subsection (a) shall be the exclusive right to perform or provide such utility services within the boundaries of the county and without the boundaries of the county, as permitted by law.

Notwithstanding subdivisions (a)(1) and (2), any utility district created pursuant to chapter 82 of this title or Private Acts of 1959, chapter 175, that is providing service on the effective date of the charter shall possess all powers, rights, obligations, duties and privileges as are granted to it by such public or private act, as may subsequently be amended.

The powers, rights, obligations, duties and privileges granted in subsection (a) shall be exercised and administered through such board or boards, commission or commissions or franchise or franchises as are authorized or established under the charter.

Any such utility board or commission not otherwise established under charter provisions required by § 7-21-206(p), that is created by the legislative body of the unified government, shall be composed of not less than five (5) nor more than nine (9) members who are appointed in accordance with procedures specified in the charter.

The members must be, at a minimum, citizens of the jurisdiction or jurisdictions served by the utility, who are of legal age, and who are not elected officials or employees of any governmental unit or agency within the county. Upon the effective date of the charter, all existing members of utility boards or commissions established under charter provisions required by § 7-21-206(p) shall automatically be appointed to continue to serve the balance of their term of office as provided in such private act or municipal charter provision governing such utility immediately prior to the effective date of the charter.

Acts 1991, ch. 497, § 301.

7-21-302. Assumption of utility services provided within county — Procedure.

Any unified government created and established pursuant to this chapter may at any time assume and take over the utility services provided within its county by any utility service provider created, authorized or owned by any private or public entity located outside such county, referred to as “outside utility service provider”.

In exercising the powers granted in subsection (a), the unified government shall notify any outside utility service provider of its desire to assume responsibility for all or any part of the outside utility service provider's functions, services or duties within the county of the unified government. It shall then be the duty of the outside utility service provider and the unified government to attempt to reach agreement in writing for the allocation to the unified government of any such public functions, services or duties as the unified government may desire to assume, and all related rights, duties, property, assets and liabilities of the outside utility service provider that justice and reason may require under the circumstances. Any matters upon which the respective parties are not in agreement in writing within sixty (60) days after a unified government gives such notice shall be settled by arbitration in accordance with the law of arbitration of the state of Tennessee effective at the time of submission to the arbitrators, except that § 29-5-101(2) shall not apply to any arbitration under this section. The award so rendered shall be transmitted to the chancery court of the county of the unified government, and then shall be subject to review in accordance with §§ 29-5-113, 29-5-115 and 29-5-118.

Acts 1991, ch. 497, § 302.

Cross-References. Arbitration, Title 29, ch. 5.

7-21-303. Smaller cities — Utility services.

Notwithstanding anything in this part to the contrary, no unified government may take over, assume or acquire any powers, rights, obligations, duties and privileges with respect to any utility service created, authorized or owned by a smaller city not electing to merge into the unified government, unless and until the legislative body of such smaller city expressly consents to the acquisition by the unified government.

Express consent shall be evidenced by the execution by the smaller city of a franchise agreement granting to the service provider rights and authority within the boundary of the smaller city, subject to such terms and conditions as may mutually be agreed upon between the smaller city and service provider.

Notwithstanding anything in this part to the contrary, in the event that a unified government shall take over, assume or acquire by any means the assets, property or rights of any utility district located within the county of the unified government and any of such assets, property or rights are located within or relate to any smaller city not electing to unify, the smaller city shall have the right and option to acquire such assets, property or rights as are located within or relate to, or that reasonably and economically cannot be separated from such assets and property, as are located within the smaller city upon assumption by the smaller city of the debts, obligations and liabilities reasonably incurred or related to such property, assets or rights.

If the parties are not in agreement in writing within sixty (60) days after acquisition by the unified government, the matters upon which agreement have not been reached shall be settled by arbitration in accordance with the law of arbitration of the state of Tennessee effective at the time of submission to the arbitrators, except that § 29-5-101(2) shall not apply to any arbitration under this section.

The award so rendered shall be transmitted to the chancery court of the county of the unified government and then shall be subject to review in accordance with §§ 29-5-113, 29-5-115 and 29-5-118.

Acts 1991, ch. 497, § 303.

Cross-References. Arbitration, Title 29, ch. 5.